Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-390
Residential facilities; persons admitted; rights retained; rules and regulations.

A person shall not lose his or her rights as a citizen, his or her property rights, or his or her legal capacity by reason of being admitted to a residential facility. The department may make reasonable rules and regulations concerning the exercise of such rights within the residential facility. Every person admitted to a residential facility under sections 83-217, 83-218, and 83-381 to 83-390 shall have an absolute right to communicate with the department, any court, a member of his or her family who does not file a written objection thereto with the department, a physician, or an attorney and to be visited at any reasonable hour by a physician or attorney. The department may make reasonable rules and regulations concerning communication by letter or otherwise with any other person or agency and concerning the right to receive other visitors.

Laws 1969, c. 816, § 10, p. 3067;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 805.